lib/hunspell-1.2.10/src/tools/dics/si_LK/dictionaries/si-LK.dic
අකුර/1,4,17,18,24,56,77,85,474,585,725,1625,3209
අටසිය/22,870
අන්තර්ගත/2,15,19,21,70,4314
අපේක්ෂා/253,498,1864,1865,1866,3187
අමුතු/2,8,11,54,2213,2931,2933,4483,4497,4512
අර්ධ/2,10,13,66,732,3581,3916
ඇදුණ/3,20,24,49,115,286,1225,1680,3899
ඇඹරී/8,332,4694
ඇරෙන/44,55,67,159,1944
ඇසෙන/24,44,55,67,852
ඉන්පසු/10,4179
උගුර/3,4,24,725,1064,1631
එරෙන/44,67,3603
කඳුවල/4817
කරදර/2,13,19,21,30,48,414,896,3129,4934,4942
කරදෙ/4461
කරමත/1990
කවුඩා/4796
කිරණ/2,4,6,18,806,3610
කිවයුතු/12,1483,2213
කිහිර/1623
කෙනා/1,10,14,95,173,2245
කෙරී/63,1310,1320
කෙරූ/4659
කෝටි/13,38,3048
ක්‍රිස්තියානි/2,9,15,19,41,132,897,3046
ක්‍රීඩා/274,989,1110,1865,1866,2338,2620,2788,2789,3184,3187,3824,4116
ක්ෂාරය/1520
ගැලවී/1824
ගෙවන/20,24,35,44,55,58,67,68,175,317,357,438,488,510,606,618,1342,1619,4753
ගොඩනැගී/135,162,832,1517,3032,3081
ගොඩනැඟිම/3600
ගොයා/1340
ජනවරම/1,3,4,18,3139
ජයගත/5,311,548,607,681,971,1011,1240
ජයග්‍රහණ/2,13,15,19,21,27,29,43,46,48,60,97,3904
ජාති/2,6,9,13,15,17,19,21,38,43,48,53,70,72,117,123,170,295,313,320,368,372,380,437,487,502,508,526,614,665,753,799,873,898,901,954,999,1050,1118,1153,1274,1276,1277,1278,1332,1523,1524,1599,1600,1747,1749,1831,2834,4152,4162,4958
ජාතිකත්වය/1520
ජිවී/9,72,4679
තැබිය/1208
තේමා/37,45,54,61,171,2845
දැමිණ/16,2059
දැමු/98,256,553,666,1046,3022
දෑකැති/2211
දේපළ/4,23,29,1495
ධාරා/1340
ධාවක/13,27,47,48,81,97,323,369,2686
නිමේෂයක/18,4646
නියෝග/2,13,15,21,43,1434,2771,4050
නිවී/135,440,542,764,2165,2999
නොකර/8,11,63,82,103,125,144,165,206,222,240,257,358,393,515,577,680,1337,3116
නොගෙන/2,20,786,1057,1973,1978
නොදනි/206,1763,4409
නොනැවතුණ/24,1680
නොපැවතුණ/24,2693
නොයා/8,50,65,96,1076,2248,3206
නොයෙදී/65,135,1322
නොසිට/8,2107,3932,3987
පංති/13,15,19,21,29,43,48,226,234,313,390,675,1332
පක්ෂියා/2248
පතුල/1,3,5,7,32,85,99,3335
පද්ධති/2,9,13,15,19,21,26,38,43,46,48,60,139,295,296,313,502,674,1523,1524,3735,4958
පන්සිය/2,4,13,17,38,43,46,870
පරාජය/1,3,4,7,9,22,28,843,2347,3013
පරිශ්‍රමයක/5,2985
පහරදී/3000,4687
පැටි/27,47,74,93,136,146,164,200,356,428,1734,3046
පැති/2,30,645,920,1833,2613
පැවරිණ/16,2059,3610
පැහැදි/1329,2264
පිදු/2987,4707
පිදූ/4659
පිපාසය/1,3,4,7,28,843,3169
පිපිරී/135,4784
පිබිදී/50,105,135,391,761,4884
පිළිගැන්වූ/35,403
ප්ලාසා/4379
බවකි/9,352,833
බුදු/9,41,52,64,72,132,232,381,392,728,1438,2206,2436,2502,2522,3634,3649,3854,3951
බුද්ධිමතෙකි/1016
බුරුම/2,15,19,21,574,1205
බුලන/1136,3816
බ්‍රිතාන්‍යය/1,3,6,7,9,31,41,89,114,1004
මයින/9,20,72,79,89,221,279,1647
මහතා/1,2,6,10,11,12,14,31,39,40,96,107,111,312,413,837,1014,1519,2279,4379
මාඔය/3,2484
මැද්දට/1497,1502
මැසූ/4198
මිත්‍රයා/3017
මිනිසා/1,10,14,40,85,96,107,173,404,653,1829,4731,4877
මුණගැසී/50,65,75,78,135,162,464,491,1310
මුදා/63,358,687,2325
මෙට්ට/2,3583
මොළය/1,3,4,865
මෝසම/4,5,77,1205
යථාර්ථය/1,3,4,6,7,9,11,23,1058,2484
යනවා/1,6,12,194,934
යන්තම්පළ/1495
යුවල/1,14,22,23,3335,3336
රකුසාට/178
රටෙක/16,25,323,779,1424
රිදී/61,101,183,332,541,761,767,1144,1517,3007,4847
රුපි/4917
රොදක/5,18,1424,2985
රෝපණ/2,19,3904
වගකිම/5,2031
වටකර/63,125,3053
වනජීවි/41,313
වනවා/1,6,12,31,149,593,934,1045,1927
වළක්වාලන/58,68,1521,4951
වළාවට/178
වැරැදී/71,4457
වැසී/449,456,580,3032
විකට/47,3583
විචලක/2686
විජය/321,561,780,862,1704,2140,3367
විපරමට/84
විභව/2,16,27,3029,4756,4757,4758
විභාග/1,2,11,13,15,19,21,30,43,48,66,250,274,293,493,1434,2598,2771
විමැසී/71,245,655,2270
විරිත/4,5,18,152,2710
විරෝධතා/1126
විලිස්සා/2330
විවර/2,10,11,13,60,297,685,1262,3021,4206,4934,4942
විස්තර/15,26,27,46,70,281,3021,3269,3270
වීදි/2,13,15,19,26,29,30,38,53,2069,2267,4813
වෙළෙඳපල/1,3,3336
ව්‍යාධිය/7,865
ශ්‍රවණ/2,4362
සංග්‍රහ/2,13,15,19,21,27,46,48,60,250,552,3280,3281
සමතුලිතතාවය/1,3,7,4663
සමිත/20,801,2710
සළකා/3079,4896
සැකසී/440,2270,2999,4827
සැලකී/65,71,75,78,105,332,345,440,541,542,831,832,1144,1322,1812,3003
සැලකු/666,3022,4029
සිරගෙය/4,18,634
සීයක/1,5,16,40,3730
සුදු/61,408,1178,1184,2068,2206,3564
සුමට/746
සුරැකී/162,332,655,1320
සූකී/4201
සෙයා/90,233,1541
හයිය/1,4,7,20,1208
හානි/2,12,13,15,19,30,36,43,46,48,86,253,435,2113,2158,2844,3729
හෙවණ/22,806
ෆර්ත/5,1990
